California statutes. Labor Code
(1) To appear, defend, and appeal claims.

(2) To receive notice of, investigate, adjust, compromise, settle, and pay claims.

(3) To investigate, handle, and deny claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 252, Sec. 5.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3744.

(a) (1) The fund shall have the right and obligation to obtain reimbursement from an insolvent self-insurer up to the amount of the self-insurer’s workers’ compensation obligations paid and assumed by the fund, including reasonable administrative and legal costs. This right includes, but is not limited to, a right to claim for wages and other necessities of life advanced to claimants as subrogee of the claimants in any action to collect against the self-insured as debtor. For purposes of this section, “insolvent self-insurer” includes the entity to which
 the certificate of consent to self-insure was issued, any guarantor of the entity’s liabilities under the certificate, any member of a self-insurance group to which the certificate was issued, and any employer who obtained employees from a self-insured employer under subdivision (d) of Section 3602.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph are declaratory of existing law.

(b) The fund shall have the right and obligation to obtain from the security deposit of an insolvent self-insurer the amount of the self-insurer’s compensation obligations, including reasonable administrative and legal costs, paid or assumed by the fund. Reimbursement of administrative costs, including legal costs, shall be subject
 to approval by a majority vote of the fund’s trustees. The fund shall be a party in interest in any action to obtain the security deposit for the payment of compensation obligations of an insolvent self-insurer.

(c) The fund shall have the right to bring an action against any person to recover compensation paid and liability assumed by the fund, including, but not limited to, any excess insurance carrier of the self-insured employer, and any person whose negligence or breach of any obligation contributed to any underestimation of the self-insured employer’s total accrued liability as reported to the director.

(d) The fund may be a party in interest in any action brought by any other person seeking damages resulting from the failure of an insolvent self-insurer to pay workers’ compensation required pursuant to this division.

(e) At the election of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, venue shall be in the Superior Court for the State of California, County of Sacramento, for any action under this section. All actions in which the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund and two or more members or former members of one self-insurance group are parties shall be consolidated if requested by the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 24.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3745.

(a) The fund shall maintain cash, readily marketable securities, or other assets, or a line of credit, approved by the director, sufficient to immediately continue the payment of the compensation obligations of an insolvent self-insurer pending assessment of the members. The director may establish the minimum amount to be maintained by, or immediately available to, the fund for this purpose.

(b) The fund may assess each of its members a pro rata share of the funding necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

(c) The trustees shall certify to the director the collection and receipt of all moneys from assessments, noting any delinquencies. The trustees
 shall take any action deemed appropriate to collect any delinquent assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 25.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3746.

The fund shall annually contract for an independent certified audit of the financial activities of the fund. An annual report on the financial status of the fund as of June 30 shall be submitted to the director and to each member, or at the election of the fund, posted on the fund’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 26.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3747.

This article shall be known and may be referred to as the “Young-La Follette Self-Insurers’ Security Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 252, Sec. 5.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Insurance Rights and Privileges [3750. - 3762.]

3750.

Nothing in this division shall affect:

(a) The organization of any mutual or other insurer.

(b) Any existing contract for insurance.

(c) The right of the employer to insure in mutual or other insurers, in whole or in part, against liability for the compensation provided by this division.

(d) The right to provide by mutual or other insurance, or by arrangement with his employees, or otherwise, for the payment to such employees, their families, dependents or representatives, of sick, accident, or death benefits, in addition to the compensation provided for by this division.

(e) The right of the employer to waive the waiting period provided for herein by insurance coverage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3751.

(a) No employer shall exact or receive from any employee any contribution, or make or take any deduction from the earnings of any employee, either directly or indirectly, to cover the whole or any part of the cost of compensation under this division. Violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(b) If an employee has filed a claim form pursuant to Section 5401, a provider of medical services shall not, with actual knowledge that a claim is pending, collect money directly from the employee for services to cure or relieve the effects of the injury for which the claim form was filed, unless the medical provider has received written notice that liability for the injury has been rejected by the employer and the medical provider has provided a copy of this notice to the employee. Any medical provider who violates this subdivision shall be liable for three times the amount unlawfully collected, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.

Liability for compensation shall not be reduced or affected by any insurance, contribution or other benefit whatsoever due to or received by the person entitled to such compensation, except as otherwise provided by this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.

The person entitled to compensation may, irrespective of any insurance or other contract, except as otherwise provided in this division, recover such compensation directly from the employer. In addition thereto, he may enforce in his own name, in the manner provided by this division the liability of any insurer either by making the insurer a party to the original application or by filing a separate application for any portion of such compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3754.

Except as provided in paragraph (12) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, payment, in whole or in part, of compensation by either the employer or the insurer shall, to the extent thereof, be a bar to recovery against each of them of the amount so paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3755.

If the employer is insured against liability for compensation, and if after the suffering of any injury the insurer causes to be served upon any compensation claimant a notice that it has assumed and agreed to pay any compensation to the claimant for which the employer is liable, such employer shall be relieved from liability for compensation to such claimant upon the filing of a copy of such notice with the appeals board. The insurer shall, without further notice, be substituted in place of the employer in any proceeding theretofore or thereafter instituted by such claimant to recover such compensation, and the employer shall be dismissed therefrom.

Such proceedings shall not abate on account of such substitution but shall be continued against such insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

3756.

If at the time of the suffering of a compensable injury, the employer is insured against liability for the full amount of compensation payable, he may cause to be served upon the compensation claimant and upon the insurer a notice that the insurer has agreed to pay any compensation for which the employer is liable. The employer may also file a copy of such notice with the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

3757.

If it thereafter appears to the satisfaction of the appeals board that the insurer has assumed the liability for compensation, the employer shall thereupon be relieved from liability for compensation to the claimant. The insurer shall, after notice, be substituted in place of the employer in any proceeding instituted by the claimant to recover compensation, and the employer shall be dismissed therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

3758.

A proceeding to obtain compensation shall not abate on account of substitution of the insurer in place of the employer and on account of the dismissal of the employer, but shall be continued against such insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3759.

The appeals board may enter its order relieving the employer from liability where it appears from the pleadings, stipulations, or proof that an insurer joined as party to the proceeding is liable for the full compensation for which the employer in such proceeding is liable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

3760.

Every employer who is insured against any liability imposed by this division shall file with the insurer a complete report of every injury to each employee as specified in Section 6409.1. If not so filed, the insurer may petition the appeals board for an order, or the appeals board may of its own motion issue an order, directing the employer to submit a report of the injury within five days after service of the order. Failure of the employer to comply with the appeals board’s order may be punished by the appeals board as a contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1019, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3761.

(a) An insurer securing an employer’s liability under this division shall notify the employer, within 15 days, of each claim for indemnity filed against the employer directly with the insurer if the employer has not timely provided to the insurer a report of occupational injury or occupational illness pursuant to Section 6409.1. The insurer shall furnish an employer who has not filed this report with an opportunity to provide to the insurer, prior to the expiration of the applicable time period specified in
 subdivision (b) of Section 5402 for rejecting a claim, all relevant information available to the employer concerning the claim.

(b) (1) An employer shall promptly notify its insurer in writing at any time during the pendency of a claim if the employer has actual knowledge of any facts that would tend to disprove any aspect of the employee’s claim. If an employer notifies its insurer in writing that, in the employer’s opinion, no compensation is payable to an employee, at the employer’s written request, to the appeals board, the appeals board may approve a compromise and release agreement, or stipulation, that provides compensation to the employee only if there is proof of service upon the employer by the insurer, to the employer’s last known address, not less than 15 days prior to the appeals board action, of
 notice of the time and place of the hearing at which the compromise and release agreement or stipulation is to be approved. The insurer shall file proof of this service with the appeals board.

(2) Failure by the insurer to provide the required notice shall not prohibit the board from approving a compromise and release agreement, or stipulation. However, the board shall order the insurer to pay reasonable expenses as provided in Section 5813.

(c) In establishing a reserve pursuant to a claim that affects premiums against an employer, an insurer shall provide the employer, upon request, a written report of the reserve amount established. The written report shall include, at a minimum, the following:

(1) Estimated
 medical-legal costs.

(2) Estimated vocational rehabilitation costs, if any.

(3) Itemization of all other estimated expenses to be paid from the reserve.

(d) If an employer properly provides notification to its insurer pursuant to subdivision (b), and the appeals board thereafter determines that no compensation is payable under this division, the insurer shall reimburse the employer for any premium paid solely due to the inclusion of the successfully challenged payments in the calculation of the employer’s experience modification. The employee shall not be required to refund the challenged payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 835, Sec. 1.   (SB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3762.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the insurer shall discuss all elements of the claim file that affect the employer’s premium with the employer, and shall supply copies of the documents that affect the premium at the employer’s expense during reasonable business hours.

(b) The right provided by this section shall not extend to any document that the insurer is prohibited from disclosing to the employer under the attorney-client privilege, any other applicable privilege, or statutory prohibition upon disclosure, or under Section 1877.4 of the Insurance Code.

(c) An insurer, third-party administrator
 retained by a self-insured employer pursuant to Section 3702.1 to administer the employer’s workers’ compensation claims, and those employees and agents specified by a self-insured employer to administer the employer’s workers’ compensation claims, are prohibited from disclosing or causing to be disclosed to an employer, any medical information, as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, about an employee who has filed a workers’ compensation claim, except as follows:

(1) Medical information limited to the diagnosis of the mental or physical condition for which workers’ compensation is claimed and the treatment provided for this condition.

(2) Medical information regarding the injury for which workers’ compensation is claimed that is necessary for the employer to have in order for the employer to modify the employee’s work duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 20.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Construction Permit [3800. - 3800.]

3800.

(a) Every county or city which requires the issuance of a permit as a condition precedent to the construction, alteration, improvement, demolition, or repair of any building or structure shall require that each applicant for the permit sign a declaration under penalty of perjury verifying workers’ compensation coverage or exemption from coverage, as required by Section 19825 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) At the time of permit issuance, contractors shall show their valid workers’ compensation insurance certificate, or the city or county may verify the workers’ compensation coverage by electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 982, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Workers’ Compensation Misrepresentations [3820. - 3823.]

3820.

(a) In enacting this section, the Legislature declares that there exists a compelling interest in eliminating fraud in the workers’ compensation system. The Legislature recognizes that the conduct prohibited by this section is, for the most part, already subject to criminal penalties pursuant to other provisions of law. However, the Legislature finds and declares that the addition of civil money penalties will provide necessary enforcement flexibility. The Legislature, in exercising its plenary authority related to workers’ compensation, declares that these sections are both necessary and carefully tailored to combat the fraud and abuse that is rampant in the workers’ compensation system.

(b) It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(1) Willfully misrepresent any fact in order to obtain workers’ compensation insurance at less than the proper rate.

(2) Present or cause to be presented any knowingly false or fraudulent written or oral material statement in support of, or in opposition to, any claim for compensation for the purpose of obtaining or denying any compensation, as defined in Section 3207.

(3) Knowingly solicit, receive, offer, pay, or accept any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement for soliciting or referring clients or patients to obtain services or benefits pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) unless the payment or receipt of consideration for services other than the referral of clients or patients is lawful pursuant to Section 650 of the Business and Professions Code or expressly permitted by the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar.

(4) Knowingly operate or participate in a service that, for profit, refers or recommends clients or patients to obtain medical or medical-legal services or benefits pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200).

(5) Knowingly assist, abet, solicit, or conspire with any person who engages in an unlawful act under this section.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “statement” includes, but is not limited to, any notice, proof of injury, bill for services, payment for services, hospital or doctor records, X-ray, test results, medical-legal expenses as defined in Section 4620, or other evidence of loss, expense, or payment.

(d) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, to a civil penalty of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), plus an assessment of not more than three times the amount of the medical treatment expenses paid pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) and medical-legal expenses paid pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4620) for each claim for compensation submitted in violation of this section.

(e) Any person who violates subdivision (b) and who has a prior felony conviction of an offense set forth in Section 1871.1 or 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, or in Section 549 of the Penal Code, shall be subject, in addition to the penalties set forth in subdivision (d), to a civil penalty of four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each item or service with respect to which a violation of subdivision (b) occurred.

(f) The penalties provided for in subdivisions (d) and (e) shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by any district attorney.

(g) In assessing the amount of the civil penalty the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following: the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(h) All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account in the Insurance Fund pursuant to Section 1872.83 of the Insurance Code. All costs incurred by district attorneys in carrying out this article shall be funded from the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program instituted by this article be supported entirely from funds produced by moneys deposited into the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account from the imposition of civil money penalties for workers’ compensation fraud collected pursuant to this section. All moneys claimed by district attorneys as costs of carrying out this article shall be paid pursuant to a determination by the Fraud Assessment Commission established by Section 1872.83 of the Insurance Code and on appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3822.

The administrative director shall, on an annual basis, provide to every employer, claims adjuster, third party administrator, physician, and attorney who participates in the workers’ compensation system, a notice that warns the recipient against committing workers’ compensation fraud. The notice shall specify the penalties that are applied for committing workers’ compensation fraud. The Fraud Assessment Commission, established by Section 1872.83 of the Insurance Code, shall provide the administrative director with all funds necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3823.

(a) The administrative director, in coordination with the Bureau of Fraudulent Claims of the Department of Insurance, the Medi-Cal Fraud Task Force, and the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse of the Department of Justice, or their successor entities, shall adopt protocols, to the extent that these protocols are applicable to achieve the purpose of subdivision (b), similar to those adopted by the Department of Insurance concerning medical billing and provider fraud.

(b) An insurer, self-insured employer, third-party administrator, workers’ compensation administrative law judge, audit unit, attorney, or other person that believes that a fraudulent
 claim has been made by any person or entity providing medical care, as described in Section 4600, shall report the apparent fraudulent claim in the manner prescribed by subdivision (a).

(c) An insurer, self-insured employer, third-party administrator, workers’ compensation administrative law judge, audit unit, attorney, or other person that reports any apparent fraudulent claim
 under this section shall not be subject to any civil liability in a cause of action of any kind when the insurer, self-insured employer, third-party administrator, workers’ compensation administrative law judge, audit unit, attorney, or other person acts in good faith, without malice, and reasonably believes that the action taken was warranted by the known facts, obtained by reasonable efforts. This section does not abrogate or lessen the existing common law or statutory privileges and immunities of an insurer, self-insured employer, third-party administrator, workers’ compensation administrative law judge, audit unit, attorney, or other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 7.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Subrogation of Employer [3850. - 3865.]

3850.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Employee” includes the person injured and any other person to whom a claim accrues by reason of the injury or death of the former.

(b) “Employer” includes insurer as defined in this division.

(c) “Employer” also includes the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, where the employer’s compensation obligations have been assumed pursuant to Section 3743.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 252, Sec. 6.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3851.

The death of the employee or of any other person, does not abate any right of action established by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3852.

(a) The claim of an employee, including, but not limited to, any peace officer or firefighter, for compensation does not affect their claim or right of action for all damages proximately resulting from the injury or death against any person other than the employer. Except as provided in subdivision (b), an employer who pays, or becomes obligated to pay compensation, or who pays, or becomes obligated to pay salary in lieu of compensation, or who pays or becomes obligated to pay an amount to the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4706.5, may likewise make a claim or bring an action against the third person. In the latter event the employer may recover in the same suit, in addition to the total amount of compensation, damages for
 which they were liable including all salary, wage, pension, or other emolument paid
 to the employee or to their dependents. The respective rights against the third person of the heirs of an employee claiming under Section 377.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and an employer claiming pursuant to this section, shall be determined by the court.

(b) (1) This subdivision applies only to an employee who is a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a
 firefighter who is employed by any of the following:

(A) A city.

(B) A county.

(C) A city and county.

(D) A fire protection district.

(2) An employer of an employee described in paragraph (1) shall be entitled to receive no more than one-third of a third-party defendant’s applicable liability insurance policy limits, if both of the following are true:

(A) The employee establishes that their total damages exceed the net recovery available after satisfaction of the employer’s claim.

(B) The total liability insurance limits available are insufficient to fully compensate the employer and employee’s proven damages.

(3) The
 one-third maximum allocation under this subdivision is intended to reflect a fair and equitable share of the recovery in light of the injured employee’s total damages, attorney’s fees, and costs of suit, and shall be deemed exclusive of any lien or offset by the employer.

(4) The employer’s right to reimbursement or subrogation shall be subordinate to the
 maximum allocation set forth in this subdivision. The maximum allocation to the employer described in this subdivision shall apply to all settlement agreements and judgments and shall take precedence over any employer lien or subrogation claim. Any remaining proceeds may then be allocated in accordance with existing lien and subrogation principles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 763, Sec. 1.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3853.

If either the employee or the employer brings an action against such third person, he shall forthwith give to the other a copy of the complaint by personal service or certified mail. Proof of such service shall be filed in such action. If the action is brought by either the employer or employee, the other may, at any time before trial on the facts, join as party plaintiff or shall consolidate his action, if brought independently.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

3854.

If the action is prosecuted by the employer alone, evidence of any amount which the employer has paid or become obligated to pay by reason of the injury or death of the employee is admissible, and such expenditures or liability shall be considered as proximately resulting from such injury or death in addition to any other items of damage proximately resulting therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

3855.

If the employee joins in or prosecutes such action, either the evidence of the amount of disability indemnity or death benefit paid or to be paid by the employer or the evidence of loss of earning capacity by the employee shall be admissible, but not both. Proof of all other items of damage to either the employer or employee proximately resulting from such injury or death is admissible and is part of the damages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3856.

In the event of suit against such third party:

(a) If the action is prosecuted by the employer alone, the court shall first order paid from any judgment for damages recovered the reasonable litigation expenses incurred in preparation and prosecution of such action, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee which shall be based solely upon the services rendered by the employer’s attorney in effecting recovery both for the benefit of the employer and the employee. After the payment of such expenses and attorney’s fees, the court shall apply out of the amount of such judgment an amount sufficient to reimburse the employer for the amount of his expenditure for compensation together with any amounts to which he may be entitled as special damages under Section 3852 and shall order any excess paid to the injured employee or other person entitled thereto.

(b) If the action is prosecuted by the employee alone, the court shall first order paid from any judgment for damages recovered the reasonable litigation expenses incurred in preparation and prosecution of such action, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee which shall be based solely upon the services rendered by the employee’s attorney in effecting recovery both for the benefit of the employee and the employer. After the payment of such expenses and attorney’s fee the court shall, on application of the employer, allow as a first lien against the amount of such judgment for damages, the amount of the employer’s expenditure for compensation together with any amounts to which he may be entitled as special damages under Section 3852.

(c) If the action is prosecuted both by the employee and the employer, in a single action or in consolidated actions, and they are represented by the same agreed attorney or by separate attorneys, the court shall first order paid from any judgment for damages recovered, the reasonable litigation expenses incurred in preparation and prosecution of such action or actions, together with reasonable attorneys’ fees based solely on the services rendered for the benefit of both parties where they are represented by the same attorney, and where they are represented by separate attorneys, based solely upon the service rendered in each instance by the attorney in effecting recovery for the benefit of the party represented. After the payment of such expenses and attorneys’ fees the court shall apply out of the amount of such judgment for damages an amount sufficient to reimburse the employer for the amount of his expenditures for compensation together with any other amounts to which he may be entitled as special damages under Section 3852.

(d) The amount of reasonable litigation expenses and the amount of attorneys’ fees under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section shall be fixed by the court. Where the employer and employee are represented by separate attorneys they may propose to the court, for its consideration and determination, the amount and division of such expenses and fees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

3857.

The court shall, upon further application at any time before the judgment is satisfied, allow as a further lien the amount of any expenditures of the employer for compensation subsequent to the original order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3858.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), after payment of litigation expenses and attorney’s fees fixed by the court pursuant to Section 3856 and payment of the employer’s lien, the employer shall be relieved from the obligation to pay further compensation to or on behalf of the employee under this division up to the entire amount of the balance of the judgment, if satisfied, without any deduction. No satisfaction of such judgment in whole or in part, shall be valid without giving the employer notice and a reasonable opportunity to perfect and satisfy their lien.

(b) In any case governed by subdivision (b) of Section 3852, the employer’s lien or subrogation rights shall be limited to the portion of the recovery allocated to the employer and the employer shall have no right to assert any credit or offset against future workers’ compensation benefits owed to the employee, including, but not limited to, temporary disability, permanent disability, medical treatment, or vocational rehabilitation. The recovery allocated to the
 employer under subdivision (b) of Section 3852 shall not affect or diminish the employer’s obligation to provide any compensation under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3859.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a release or settlement of any claim under this chapter as to either the employee or the employer is not valid without the written consent of both. Proof of service filed with the court is sufficient in any action or proceeding where such approval is required by law.

(2) The written consent of the
 employer is not required in a claim that is subject to subdivision (b) of Section 3852.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter, an employee may settle and release any claim they may have against a third party without the consent of the employer. Except as provided in paragraph (2), a settlement or release shall be subject to the employer’s right to proceed to recover compensation they have paid in accordance with Section 3852.

(2) In any case governed by subdivision (b) of Section
 3852, a settlement or release shall limit the employer’s claim for reimbursement to the portion of the settlement
 allocated to the employer
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3852.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 763, Sec. 3.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3860.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a release or settlement under this chapter, with or without suit, is not valid or binding as to any party thereto without notice to both the employer and the employee, with opportunity to the employer to recover the amount of compensation the employer has paid or become obligated to pay and any special damages to which the employer may be entitled under Section 3852, and opportunity to the employee to recover all damages the employee has suffered and with provision for determination of expenses and attorney’s fees as herein provided.

(2) If the employee is a peace officer, as defined in
 Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal
 Code, or a firefighter, a release or settlement, with or without suit, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 3852, is not valid or binding unless it provides that the employer shall not receive more than one-third of the third-party insurance limits.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and Section 3859, the entire amount of the settlement, with or without suit, is subject to the employer’s full claim for reimbursement for compensation the employer has paid or become obligated to pay and any special damages to which the employer may be entitled under Section 3852, together with expenses
 and attorney’s fees, if any, subject to the limitations in this section set forth.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3852, the employer’s claim for reimbursement shall be limited to the portion of the settlement allocated to the employer. The employer shall have no right to assert any credit or offset against future workers’ compensation benefits.

(c) If settlement is effected, with or without suit, solely through the efforts of the employee’s attorney, then prior to the reimbursement of the employer, as provided in subdivision (b) hereof, there shall be deducted from the amount of the settlement the reasonable expenses incurred in effecting settlement, including costs of suit, if any, together with reasonable attorney’s fees to be paid to the employee’s attorney, for services rendered in securing and effecting settlement for the benefit of both the employer and the employee.

(d) If settlement is effected, with or without suit, solely through the efforts of the employer’s attorney, then, prior to the reimbursement of the employer as provided in subdivision (b) hereof, there shall be deducted from the amount of the settlement the reasonable expenses incurred in effecting settlement, including costs of suit, if any, together with reasonable attorney’s fees to be paid to the employer’s attorney, for services rendered in securing and effecting settlement for the benefit of both the employer and the employee.

(e) If both the employer and the employee are represented by the same agreed attorney or by separate attorneys in effecting a settlement, with or without suit, prior to reimbursement of the employer, as provided in subdivision (b) hereof, there shall be deducted
 from the amount of the settlement the reasonable expenses incurred by both the employer and the employee or on behalf of either, including costs of suit, if any, together with reasonable attorney’s fees to be paid to the respective attorneys for the employer and the employee, based upon the respective services rendered in securing and effecting settlement for the benefit of the party represented. If both parties are represented by the same attorney, by agreement, the attorney’s fees shall be based on the services rendered for the benefit of both.

(f) The amount of expenses and attorney’s fees referred to in this section shall, on settlement of suit, or on any settlement requiring court approval, be set by the court. In all other cases these amounts shall be set by the appeals board. If the employer and the employee are represented by separate
 attorneys they may propose to the court or the appeals board, for consideration and determination, the amount and division of those expenses and fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 763, Sec. 4.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3861.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the appeals board is empowered to and shall allow, as a credit to the employer to be applied against their liability for compensation, such amount of any recovery by the employee for their injury, either by settlement or after judgment, as has not theretofore been applied to the payment of expenses or attorneys’ fees, pursuant to the provisions of Sections 3856, 3858, and 3860, or has not been applied to reimburse the employer.

(b) In